Massachusetts, session 194th, H2293.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, any
municipality receiving abatement funds in accordance with the Massachusetts state-subdivision
agreement for statewide opioid settlement funds, shall submit an annual report by July 1 each
year, to the department of public health detailing how they plan to spend said funds in the
upcoming fiscal year.
The report shall include but not be limited to the total amount of abatement funds that the
municipality plans to spend and what proposed programs and initiatives the funds will be spent
on to mitigate the impacts of the opioid epidemic in their communities, provided that the first
report submitted may be preliminary. Municipalities spending less than 50 percent of the annual
allocation shall include in the report plans to utilize the remainder of the funds and identify any
barriers that are preventing the funds from being used.
of 2

The executive office of health and human services shall review said reports and provide
written feedback to each municipality including, but not limited to, best practices to implement
their programs and proposals; what state resources are available to support with the
implementation of these proposals; and what available state or federal funding may be available
to augment these proposals.
of 2